District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.11

Establishment of the Department of Small and Local Business Development.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), there is established, as a subordinate agency, in the Executive Branch of the government of the District of Columbia, the Department of Small and Local Business Development.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2311, 52 DCR 7503

History

This section is referenced in § 2-218.02 and § 10-833.

Section References

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2311 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Emergency Legislation